src/propernoun-smj-morph.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ================================ !
! Lule Sáme Proper noun morphology !
! ================================ !


! Even



! Name lexica

! Even syllable
! =============

! No CG

LEXICON ACCRA-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ACCRADECL ; 

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ; 

LEXICON ACCRA-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ; 

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ; 

LEXICON ACCRA-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON ACCRA-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON ACCRA-femsur
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Sur:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON ACCRA-malfem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON ACCRA-objplc
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%> VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-femplc
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%> VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON ACCRA-malsur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

 
LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%> VUONAK ; !


LEXICON ACCRA-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%> VUONAK ;

!LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-surplc ! Names that are both surnames and place names
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
! +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
! +N+Prop+Plc:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%> VUONAK ; !

LEXICON ACCRA-surplc ! Names that are both surnames and place names
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%> VUONAK ;

LEXICON ACCRA ! Vowel-final names without Gradation and Ill change
 +N+Prop:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> RONDANEDECL ;

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> RONDANEDECL-SG ;

LEXICON RONDANE-LOAN ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  RONDANEDECL-LOAN ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%> VUONAK ; !

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-LOAN ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  RONDANEDECL-SG-LOAN ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%> VUONAK ; !

LEXICON RONDANE-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> RONDANEDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON RONDANE-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> RONDANEDECL ; 


LEXICON RONDANE-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> RONDANEDECL ; 


LEXICON RONDANE-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  RONDANEDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON RONDANE-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  RONDANEDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON RONDANEDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-DC ;
 
LEXICON RONDANEDECL-SG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-DC-SG ;

LEXICON RONDANEDECL-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-DC-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !
 
LEXICON RONDANEDECL-SG-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ RONDANE-DC-SG-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !

LEXICON RONDANE-DC
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;       
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i     
 +Pl+Acc:Q4jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:Q4jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:Q4js K ;
 +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com:Q4jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ; ! Norgejn
 
LEXICON RONDANE-DC-SG
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;       
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
! +Pl+Nom: K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i     
! +Pl+Acc:Q4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:Q4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:Q4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com:Q4jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ; ! Norgejn

 
LEXICON RONDANE-DC-LOAN
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;       
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: RHyph ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:v K ; !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:n K ; !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:s K ; !
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i     
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:Q4jt K ; !
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:Q4jda K ; !
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:Q4jn K ; !
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:Q4js K ; !
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:Q4jn K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ; ! !SUB Norgejn

LEXICON RONDANE-DC-SG-LOAN
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;       
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: RHyph ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:v K ; !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:n K ; !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:s K ; !
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub: K ; !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i     
! +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:Q4jt K ; !
! +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:Q4jda K ; !
! +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:Q4jn K ; !
! +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:Q4js K ; !
! +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:Q4jn K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ; ! !SUB Norgejn


LEXICON DUBAI-fem
! Different lexicon for female persons. Audhild.
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> DUBAIDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@i # ; !

LEXICON DUBAI-org
! Different lexicon for organisations. Microsoft.
 +N+Prop+Org:%> DUBAIDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 
LEXICON DUBAI-mal
! Different lexicon for male persons. Finn. Torfinn.
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> DUBAIDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@i # ; !

LEXICON DUBAI-sur
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. Blind
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> DUBAIDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@i # ; !
 
LEXICON DUBAI-plc
! Different lexicon for place names. Bern.
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> DUBAIDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:i%>ja VUONAK ;

LEXICON DUBAIDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAIUCASE ;
 
LEXICON DUBAIDECL_PLC-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUBAIUCASE_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub:ija LASJ ; !


LEXICON DUBAIUCASE ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom:i K ;
 +Sg+Nom:i RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Ill:ijaj K ;
 +Ess:ijan K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ija K ;
 +Sg+Gen:i K ;
 +Sg+Gen:i RHyph ;       
 +Sg+Acc:ijav K ;
 +Sg+Ine:ijan K ;
 +Sg+Ela:ijas K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ija K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijaj K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijaj RHyph ;      
 +Pl+Acc:ijajt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijajda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijajn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijajs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ijaj K ;
 +Sg+Com:ijajn K ;


LEXICON DUBAIUCASE_PLC-ORG ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom:i K ;
 +Sg+Nom:i RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Ill:ijaj K ;
 +Ess:ijan K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ija K ;
 +Sg+Gen:i K ;
 +Sg+Gen:i RHyph ;       
 +Sg+Acc:ijav K ;
 +Sg+Ine:ijan K ;
 +Sg+Ela:ijas K ;
! +Pl+Nom:ija K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ijaj K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ijaj RHyph ;      
! +Pl+Acc:ijajt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:ijajda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:ijajn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:ijajs K ;
! +Pl+Com:ijaj K ;
 +Sg+Com:ijajn K ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-DC ;
 
LEXICON ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-DC_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !

 
LEXICON ACCRADECL-LOAN
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-DC-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !


LEXICON ACCRA-DC
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;       
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i     
 +Pl+Acc:Q4jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:Q4jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:Q4js K ;
 +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com:Q4jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ; ! Norgejn
 
LEXICON ACCRA-DC_PLC-ORG
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;       
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
! +Pl+Nom: K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i     
! +Pl+Acc:Q4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:Q4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:Q4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com:Q4jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ; ! Norgejn

 
LEXICON ACCRA-DC-LOAN
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;       
 +Ess+Use/Sub:n K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: RHyph ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:v K ; !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:n K ; !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:s K ; !
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub: K ; !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i     
! +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:Q4jt K ; !
! +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:Q4jda K ; !
! +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:Q4jn K ; !
! +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:Q4js K ; !
! +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:Q4j K ; ! !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:Q4jn K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ; ! !SUB Norgejn
 
LEXICON GATA-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ACCRADECL_PLC-ORG ;

 
LEXICON BETFAGE-plc ! Like Accra but with sub: -ej, and NORM: -ij
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> BETFAGEDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON BETFAGE-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  BETFAGEDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !
 
LEXICON BETFAGE-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  BETFAGEDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON BETFAGEDECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BETFAGE-DC ;


LEXICON BETFAGEDECL_PLC-ORG
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BETFAGE-DC_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !
 
 

LEXICON BETFAGE-DC
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;       
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:j K ; !
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
 +Pl+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i     
 +Pl+Acc:Q4jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:Q4jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:Q4js K ;
 +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com:Q4jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ; ! Norgejn
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:j K ; !
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:j K ; !     
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:jt K ; !
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:jda K ; !
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:jn K ; !
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:js K ; !
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:j K ; !
 
LEXICON BETFAGE-DC_PLC-ORG
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;       
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Ill:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:j K ; !
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Gen: RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;
! +Pl+Nom: K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i     
! +Pl+Acc:Q4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:Q4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:Q4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Com:Q4jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ; ! Norgejn
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:j K ; !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:j K ; !     
! +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:jt K ; !
! +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:jda K ; !
! +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:jn K ; !
! +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:js K ; !
! +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:j K ; !


LEXICON SUOBMA-plc ! Like MARJA but no derivation
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ MARJA-DC_PLC-ORG ;

 
